Hawaii, session 2026, SB3008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 289, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending section 1, subsection (a) to read: "(a)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the fee simple interest in the following parcels of land with the existing improvements thereon (hereinafter "the properties") (but not including submerged land, accreted land, or any land makai of the shoreline), shall be conveyed by the department of land and natural resources, department of accounting and general services, Hawaii housing finance and development corporation, or other respective state agency, as grantor, to the city and county of Honolulu as grantee, as is, where is, and subject to any existing recorded ground leases, easements, and encumbrances: (1)  [TMK 1-1-5-7-2 (senior residence at Iwilei);] TMK 9‑8‑13-14 (Westridge); (2)  TMK 1-1-5-7-1 (Liliha civic center); (3)  TMK 1-1-7-27-1 (Aala park); (4)  TMK 1-1-5-9-1 (Institute for Human Services); (5)  TMK 1-1-5-9-2 (morgue addition); (6)  TMK 1-1-5-9-3 (morgue); and (7)  TMK 1-1-5-9-10 (Iwilei fire station)." 2.  By amending section 2, subsection (d) to read: "(d)  Transfer of the parcel shall be effective December 31, [2025,] 2026, or upon final approval by the city and county of Honolulu of the terms of the transfer, whichever occurs later." 3.  By amending section 6 to read: "SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, or the day after final approval by the city and county of Honolulu of the terms of the transfer of the fee simple interest in land pursuant to part II of this Act, whichever occurs later; provided that upon the completed transfer of the fee simple interest in land pursuant to part II of this Act, the governor shall notify the legislature and the revisor of statutes that the transfer was filed or recorded with the bureau of conveyances; provided further that if the city and county of Honolulu does not finalize approval of the terms of the transfer required under part II of this Act by December 31, [2026,] 2027, this Act shall be repealed on January 1, [2027,] 2028, and section 171-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on the day before the effective date of this Act." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________